Louisiana, session 2026, SB455.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1903(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:1903(A)(5) and (H) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1903. Admission of certain entities as employers
A. The following entities may submit, for approval by the board of trustees,
a plan for extending the benefits of this Chapter to employees of the entity:
* * *
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any district
court or parish court in the state.
B. Each such plan or any amendment thereof shall be approved by the board
of trustees if it finds that such plan, or such plan as amended, is in conformity with
regulations of the board of trustees, except that no such plan shall be approved
unless:
* * *
(2)(a) It Except as provided for in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph,
it covers all services which are performed in the employ of the entity, by any
employees thereof, and it extends benefits to all employees of the entity.
(b) The board may approve the plan of an entity provided for in
Paragraph (A)(5) of this Section that does not cover all services performed in
the employ of the entity and does not extend benefits to all employees of the
entity.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 455 ENROLLED
* * *
H.(1) Any employee of an entity provided for in Paragraph (A)(5) of this
Section hired before the employer extended the benefits of this Chapter to its
employees may make an irrevocable election to become a member of the system
if that employee is enrolled in another public retirement system covering the
same employment, has not participated in the deferred retirement option plan
of, or retired from, that other system, and has not previously exercised an
irrevocable election to remain a member of the Louisiana State Employees'
Retirement System pursuant to R.S. 11:160 through 417 for the same
employment. The system shall produce all necessary forms for this purpose.
(2) Any employee who makes a timely election to join this system
pursuant to this Subsection has the same rights as any other system member to
enter into a reciprocal recognition agreement pursuant to R.S. 11:142 or
transfer service credit pursuant to R.S. 11:143, provided however, that no
person who transfers service credit to this system shall have the right to execute
a reverse transfer pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 11:143(F)(1).
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 11:1903 shall authorize approval of any district or
parish court covering designated classes of employees even if other positions paid with funds
of the court are required by law to be members of other public retirement systems. Any
member currently enrolled in another public retirement system shall be given until January
1, 2027, to make an irrevocable election to become a member of the Parochial Employees'
Retirement System of Louisiana or remain a member of their prior system.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.